Illinois, session 104th, HB578.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/1-1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1001-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475; 87-823.)